src/main/resources/Stemmer.sbl
'osim'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'ecega'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'cino'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'basu'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'snjima'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'ece'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'acale'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'esama'(R2 <-'e{sx}')
'snjem'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'vase'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'istadose'(R2 <-'ista')
'ostavsi'(R2 <-'osta')
'cina'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'acasmo'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'cinog'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'ostades'(R2 <-'osta')
'osiju'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'dajeve'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'snjomu'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'etes'(R2 <-'et')
'snjim'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'daje'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'acio'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'osoj'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'osijoj'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'isem'(R2 <-'i{sx}')
'ecom'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'gasa'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'rosila'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'tas'(R2 <-'ta')
'lucujemo'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'snjijima'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'daju'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'istavsi'(R2 <-'ista')
'astades'(R2 <-'asta')
'aciti'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'osomu'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'acise'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'astajuci'(R2 <-'astaj')
'oseg'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'acemu'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'rosim'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'osijima'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'acahu'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'cinome'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'jasama'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'iras'(R2 <-'ir')
'basima'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'aceg'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'ostajuci'(R2 <-'ostaj')
'osu'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'ecomu'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'basa'(R2 <-'ba{sx}')
'vasem'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'osima'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'acilo'(R2 <-'a{cx}')
'dajem'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'snji'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'ucem'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'gasama'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'ose'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'gasom'(R2 <-'ga{sx}')
'snjom'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'cinama'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'acah'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'rosih'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'tasama'(R2 <-'ta{sx}')
'istades'(R2 <-'ista')
'nasom'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'snjijega'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'ovase'(R2 <-'ova')
'acase'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'nasa'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'acuh'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'cinomu'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'ivsi'(R2 <-'i')
'acim'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'ecog'(R2 <-'e{cy}')
'osome'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'nasima'(R2 <-'na{sx}')
'ostajase'(R2 <-'ostaj')
'jetise'(R2 <-'jeti')
'luciti'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'snemu'(R2 <-'{sx}n')
'lucena'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'vasama'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'ajuci'(R2 <-'a')
'aca'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'rosiste'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'ucim'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'acima'(R2 <-'a{cy}')
'isi'(R2 <-'i{sx}')
'acano'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'istajes'(R2 <-'istaj')
'vasima'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'osog'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'irujuci'(R2 <-'ir')
'jasom'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'acamo'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'cinoga'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'cinoj'(R2 <-'{cx}in')
'snjija'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'acaste'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'vasa'(R2 <-'va{sx}')
'acala'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'ucemu'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'osijeg'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'uvas'(R2 <-'uva')
'nivsi'(R2 <-'ni')
'jasu'(R2 <-'ja{sx}')
'lucili'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'nuvsi'(R2 <-'n')
'ucuh'(R2 <-'u{cy}')
'lucuju'(R2 <-'lu{cx}')
'snjemu'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'acalo'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'ase'(R2 <-'a')
'dajeva'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'daja'(R2 <-'{dx}aj')
'rosile'(R2 <-'ro{sx}i')
'osija'(R2 <-'o{sx}')
'irase'(R2 <-'ir')
'urase'(R2 <-'ur')
'istem'(R2 <-'i{sx}t')
'uvajuci'(R2 <-'uva')
'snjih'(R2 <-'{sx}nj')
'astavsi'(R2 <-'asta')
'uras'(R2 <-'ur')
'acana'(R2 <-'a{cx}a')
'ieci'(R2 <-'i')

		)
	)
)

define stem as (
   do prelude
    do mark_regions
	backwards (
        do Step_1
		do Step_3
	)
)
